Maine, session 132, LD1460.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 22 MRSA §1711-H is enacted to read:
§1711-H. Hospital safe sleep rule for children; parental behavior
A hospital licensed pursuant to chapter 405 that has a safe sleep rule for children shall
inform the parent of a child who is an inpatient at the hospital of the safe sleep rule for
children, and the parent shall sign a form provided by the hospital that contains the text of
the safe sleep rule for children acknowledging that the parent knows the safe sleep rule for
children and possible penalties for violation of the safe sleep rule for children. For purposes
of this section, "safe sleep rule for children" means a set of evidence-based practices a
hospital requires to be employed in order to reduce the rate of children's unsafe sleep
injuries and sudden unexpected infant death related to unsafe sleep, including accidental
suffocation and strangulation in bed and sudden infant death syndrome.